Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.02, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Written notice required. A prospective resident, before being asked to sign a rental agreement, must be given the following notice printed verbatim in boldface type of a minimum size of ten points. The notice must be provided with the park residency application. The notice must be posted in a conspicuous and public location in the park: "IMPORTANT NOTICE State law provides special rules for the owners, residents, and prospective residents of manufactured home parks. You may keep your home in the park as long as the park is in operation and you meet your financial obligations, obey state and local laws which apply to the park, obey reasonable park rules, do not substantially annoy or endanger the other residents or substantially endanger park personnel and do not substantially damage the park premises. You may not be evicted or have your rent increased or your services cut for complaining to the park owner or to a governmental official. If you receive an eviction notice and do not leave the park, the park owner may take you to court. If you lose in court, a sheriff may remove you and your home from the park within seven days. Or, the court may require you to leave the park within seven days but give you 60 days to sell the home within the park. If you receive an eviction notice for a new or amended rule and the court finds the rule to be reasonable and not a substantial modification of your original agreement, the court will not order you to leave but will order you to comply with the rule within ten days. If you do not comply within the time given or if you violate the rule at a later time, you will be subject to eviction. All park rules and policies must be reasonable. Your rent may not be increased more than deleted text begin twicedeleted text end new text begin oncenew text end a year. Changes made in park rules after you become a park resident will not apply to you if they substantially change your original agreement. The park may not charge you an entrance fee. The park may require a security deposit, but the deposit must not amount to more than two months rent. You have a right to sell the home in the park. But the sale is not final until the park owner approves the buyer as a new resident, and you must advise in writing anyone who wants to buy your home that the sale is subject to final approval by the park owner. The park must provide to you, in writing, the procedures and criteria used to evaluate a prospective resident. If your application is denied, you can request, in writing, the reason why. You must also disclose in writing certain safety information about your home to anyone who wants to buy it in the park. You must give this information to the buyer before the sale, in writing, on the form that is attached to this notice. You must completely and accurately fill out the form and you and the buyer should each keep a copy. Your rental agreement and the park rules contain important information about your rights and duties. Read them carefully and keep a copy. You must be given a copy of the shelter or evacuation plan for the park. This document contains information on where to seek shelter in times of severe weather conditions. You should carefully review the plan and keep a copy. By February 1 of each year, the park must give you a certificate of rent paid as required by Minnesota Statutes, sections 290.0693, subdivision 4, and 290A.19. For further information concerning your rights, consult a private attorney. The state law governing the rental of lots in manufactured home parks may also be enforced by the Minnesota Attorney General." Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Notice of rent increases required. No increase in the amount of the periodic rental payment due from a resident shall be valid unless the park owner gives the resident 60 days' written notice of the increase.new text begin The notice must include the park owner's reason for the rent increase.new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.06, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rent increases limited. A park owner may impose only deleted text begin twodeleted text end new text begin onenew text end rent deleted text begin increasesdeleted text end new text begin increasenew text end on a resident in any 12-month periodnew text begin , and any increase must be reasonable. A park owner has the burden of proving by a preponderance of evidence that the rent increase is reasonable. Rent increases approved by a resident-owned cooperative formed under chapter 308A, 308B, or 308C are presumptively reasonablenew text end . Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to rent increases that take effect on or after that date. new text end